lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo liežuvėlis: Multiplikatorinė; Inercinė; Konvencinė / multiplikatorinė; Elektrinė; Muselinė; Žieminė; Spininginė; Velkiavimo; Universali; Kita
hu: Kompatibilis üzemanyag-típus: Multiplikátoros (baitcasting); Centerpin; Hagyományos multiplikátoros; Elektromos; Légyező; Léki; Peremfutó; Trolling; Univerzális; Egyéb
tr: Uyumlu olta makinesi tipi: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Geleneksel/overhead; Elektrikli; Fly; Buz; Spinning; Trolling; Evrensel; Diğer
cs: Kompatibilní typ navijáku: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Klasické/multiplikátory; Elektrické; Muškařské; Na dírky; Přívlačové; Trollingové; Univerzální; Jiné
el: Συμβατός τύπος καρουλιού: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Συμβατικός/overhead; Ηλεκτρικός; Fly; Πάγου; Spinning; Συρτής; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fr: Type de combustible compatible: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Conventionnel/à tambour tournant; Électrique; Mouche; Pêche sur glace; Spinning; Traîne; Universel; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de carretel compatível: Carretilha de perfil baixo (baitcasting); Centerpin; Carretilha de perfil alto (convencional); Elétrica; Fly; Pesca no gelo; Molinete; Corrico (trolling); Universal; Outro
it: Tipo di mulinello compatibile: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Tradizionale/a bobina rotante; Elettrico; Mosca; Ghiaccio; Spinning; Traina; Universale; Altro
pl: Zgodny typ rolki: Baitcastingowy; Ośrodkowy; Konwencjonalny / Overhead; Elektryczny; Muchowy; Podlodowy; Spinningowy; Trollingowy; Uniwersalny; Inne
ko: 호환 릴 유형: 베이트캐스팅; 센터핀; 컨벤셔널/오버헤드; 전동; 플라이; 얼음낚시; 스피닝; 트롤링; 범용; 기타
de: Kompatibler Rollentyp: Baitcast; Centerpin; Multirolle; Elektrisch; Fliegenrolle; Eisangeln; Spinnrolle; Schlepprolle; Universal; Sonstige
fi: Yhteensopiva kelan tyyppi: Hyrräkela; Centerpin; Perinteinen / vetokela; Sähkökela; Perhokela; Pilkkikela; Avokela; Vetokela; Universaali; Muu
th: ประเภทรอกที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เบทคาสติ้ง; เซ็นเตอร์พิน; มาตรฐาน/โอเวอร์เฮด; รอกไฟฟ้า; ฟลาย; ตกปลาน้ำแข็ง; สปินนิง; ทรอลลิง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta role: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konvencionalno / iznad štapa; Električno; Za mušičarenje; Za led; Spinning; Trolling; Univerzalno; Ostalo
vi: Loại guồng/cuộn tương thích: Máy câu ngang (Baitcasting); Máy câu Centerpin; Máy câu biển (Conventional/overhead); Máy câu điện; Máy câu Fly; Máy câu băng; Máy câu đứng (Spinning); Máy câu Trolling; Đa năng; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de mulinetă compatibilă: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Convențional / overhead; Electrică; Muscă; Copcă; Spinning; Trolling; Universal; Altele
es: Tipo de caña compatible: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Convencional/tambor giratorio; Eléctrica; Mosca; Hielo; Spinning; Curricán; Universal; Otro
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta rola: Baitcasting; Rola s sredinskim zatičem (centerpin); Klasična rola; Električno; Muharjenje; Za ledni ribolov; Vijačenje (spinning); Panulanje (trolling); Univerzalno; Drugo
en: Compatible reel type: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Conventional/overhead; Electric; Fly; Ice; Spinning; Trolling; Universal; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ navijaka: Baitcastový; Centerpin; Konvenčný/multiplikátor (overhead); Elektrický; Muškársky; Na lov na dierkach; Prívlačový; Trollingový; Univerzálny; Iné
ru: Совместимый тип катушки: Бейткастинговая; Инерционная (Centerpin); Мультипликаторная; Электрическая; Нахлыстовая; Для зимней рыбалки; Безынерционная; Для троллинга; Универсальный; Другое
da: Kompatibel hjultype: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konventionel/overhead; Elektrisk; Flue; Is; Fastspole; Trolling; Universal; Andet
zh-TW: 相容捲線器類型: 雙軸捲線器 (Baitcasting); 中心軸 (Centerpin); 傳統/鼓式 (Conventional/Overhead); 電動; 飛蠅; 冰釣; 紡車式 (Spinning); 拖釣; 通用; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de carreto compatível: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Convencional/trolling; Elétrica; Mosca; Gelo; Spinning; Corrico; Universal; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип макара: Бейткаст; Сентърпин; Стандартна/мултипликатор; Електрическа; За мухарски риболов; За подледен риболов; Спининг; Тролинг; Универсален; Друго
zh-CN: 适用渔线轮类型: 水滴轮; 盘车轮; 常规鼓轮; 电动轮; 飞蝇轮; 冰钓轮; 纺车轮; 拖钓轮; 通用; 其他
nb: Kompatibel spoletype: Multiplikatorsnelle; Senterpinsnelle; Konvensjonell/havfiskesnelle; Elektrisk; Flue; Isfiske; Haspel; Dorging; Universell; Annet
sv: Kompatibel vindtyp: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Konventionell/multirulle; Elektrisk; Flugrulle; Pimpelrulle; Haspelrulle; Trollingrulle; Universell; Övrigt
nl: Compatibel type vismolen: Baitcasting; Centerpin; Conventioneel/overhead; Elektrisch; Vliegvissen; IJsvissen; Spinning; Trolling; Universeel; Overig
ja: 対応リールタイプ: ベイトキャスティング; センターピン; コンベンショナル/両軸; 電動; フライ; アイス; スピニング; トローリング; ユニバーサル; その他